Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle C. Governance

§ 17-17-120.
Shareholder agreements.

All the shareholders of a statutory close corporation may agree in writing to regulate the exercise of the corporate powers and the management of the business and affairs of the corporation or the relationship among the shareholders of the corporation.

An agreement authorized by this section is effective although:

It eliminates a board of directors;

It restricts the discretion or powers of the board or authorizes director proxies or weighted voting rights;

Its effect is to treat the corporation as a partnership; or

It creates a relationship among the shareholders or between the shareholders and the corporation that would otherwise be appropriate only among partners.

If the corporation has a board of directors, an agreement authorized by this section restricting the discretion or powers of the board relieves directors of liability imposed by law, and imposes that liability on each person in whom the board’s discretion or power is vested, to the extent that the discretion or powers of the board of directors are governed by the agreement.

A provision eliminating a board of directors in an agreement authorized by this section is not effective unless the articles of incorporation contain a statement to that effect as required by W.S.

17-17-121

.

A provision entitling one (1) or more shareholders to dissolve the corporation under W.S.

17-17-133

is effective only if a statement of this right is contained in the articles of incorporation.

To amend an agreement authorized by this section, all the shareholders must approve the amendment in writing unless the agreement provides otherwise.

Subscribers for shares may act as shareholders with respect to an agreement authorized by this section if shares are not issued when the agreement was made.

This section does not prohibit any other agreement between or among shareholders in a statutory close corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-121.
Elimination of board of directors.

A statutory close corporation may operate without a board of directors if its articles of incorporation contain a statement to that effect.

An amendment to articles of incorporation eliminating a board of directors must be approved by all the shareholders of the corporation, whether or not otherwise entitled to vote on amendments, or if no shares have been issued, by all the subscribers for shares, if any, or if none, by all the incorporators.

While a corporation is operating without a board of directors as authorized by subsection (a) of this section:

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, the shareholders;

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise:

Action requiring director approval or both director and shareholder approval is authorized if approved by the shareholders; and

Action requiring a majority or greater percentage vote of the board of directors is authorized if approved by the majority or greater percentage of the votes of shareholders entitled to vote on the action.

A shareholder is not liable for his act or omission, although a director would be, unless the shareholder was entitled to vote on the action;

A requirement by a state or the United States that a document delivered for filing contain a statement that specified action has been taken by the board of directors is satisfied by a statement that the corporation is a statutory close corporation without a board of directors and that the action was approved by the shareholders; and

The shareholders by resolution may appoint one (1) or more shareholders to sign documents as “designated directors.”

An amendment to articles of incorporation deleting the statement eliminating a board of directors must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not otherwise entitled to vote on amendments. The amendment must also specify the number, names and addresses of the corporation’s directors or describe who will perform the duties of a board under W.S.

17-16-801

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-122.
Bylaws.

A statutory close corporation need not adopt bylaws if provisions required by law to be contained in bylaws are contained in either the articles of incorporation or a shareholder agreement authorized by W.S.

17-17-120

.

If a corporation does not have bylaws when its statutory close corporation status terminates under W.S.

17-17-131

, the corporation shall immediately adopt bylaws under W.S.

17-16-206

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-123.
Annual meeting.

The annual meeting date for a statutory close corporation is the last business day of the third month following the close of the business year unless its articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a shareholder agreement authorized by W.S.

17-17-120

fixes a different date.

A statutory close corporation need not hold an annual meeting unless one (1) or more shareholders deliver written notice to the corporation requesting a meeting at least thirty (30) days before the meeting date determined under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-124.
Execution of documents in more than one capacity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an individual who holds more than one (1) office in a statutory close corporation may execute, acknowledge or verify in more than one (1) capacity any document required to be executed, acknowledged or verified by the holders of two (2) or more offices.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-125.
Limited liability.

The failure of a statutory close corporation to observe the usual corporate formalities or requirements relating to the exercise of its corporate powers or management of its business and affairs is not a ground for imposing personal liability on the shareholders for liabilities of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.